District of Columbia statutes.
21-2404.03

Effect of registration.

(a)

Upon registration of a guardianship or protective order from another state, the guardian or conservator may exercise in the District of Columbia all powers authorized in the order of appointment except as prohibited under the laws of the District, including maintaining actions and proceedings in the District and, if the guardian or conservator is not a resident of the District, subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties.

(b)

The Superior Court may grant any relief available under this chapter and other law of the District of Columbia to enforce a registered order.

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-270, § 2(b), 55 DCR 11018
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 403 of the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.